Oklahoma, session 2026, HB4148.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 10001 of Title 70, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Oklahoma Kids
After-School Grant Program (OKAGP)".
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 10002 of Title 70, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:

Req. No. 15166 Page 1

A. There is hereby created at the Department of Human Services
the Oklahoma Kids After-School Grant Program (OKAGP). This grant
program shall be for community-based organizations that run after-
school programs for children grades kindergarten through twelve. To
qualify for the grant program, after-school programs that offer
reading assistance or tutoring shall be based in the science of
reading which includes providing explicit and systematic instruction
in phonological awareness, decoding, fluency, vocabulary, and
comprehension.
B. The community-based organizations described in subsection A
of this section may qualify for an exemption from the Oklahoma Child
Care Facilities Licensing Act based on the listed exemptions found
in Section 403 of Title 10 of the Oklahoma Statutes. These entities
shall operate, either themselves or through an alliance, a minimum
of five (5) locations in Oklahoma.
C. The Department of Human Services shall promulgate rules to
implement this grant program.
SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 10003 of Title 70, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
There is hereby created in the State Treasury a revolving fund
for the Department of Human Services to be designated the "Oklahoma
Kids After-School Grant Program Revolving Fund". The fund shall be
a continuing fund, not subject to fiscal year limitations, and shall
Req. No. 15166 Page 2

cons ist of all monies received by the Department of Human Services
from appropriations or donations. All monies accruing to the credit
of said fund are hereby appropriated and may be budgeted and
expended by the Department for the purpose of awarding grants under
the Oklahoma Kids After-School Grant Program. Expenditures from
said fund shall be made upon warrants issued by the State Treasurer
against claims filed as prescribed by law with the Director of the
Office of Management and Enterprise Services for approval and
payment.
SECTION 4. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

60-2-15166 SW 01/06/26












Req. No. 15166 Page 3